District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2402.07

Gallaudet University Federal Endowment Program.

Repealed.

Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 99-371, § 407
renumbered as § 207, Oct. 1, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, § 101(b)(6)
repealed Oct. 1, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, § 137(1)

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1842.7.

Prior Codifications